sv: Monteringsläge för flaskhållare: Underrör; Framgaffel; Styre; Pakethållare; Sadel; Sadelrör; Överrör; Universell; Övrigt
hu: Kerékpártartó rögzítési helye: Alsócső; Villa; Kormány; Csomagtartó; Nyereg; Nyeregvázcső; Felsőcső; Univerzális; Egyéb
zh-CN: 自行车水壶架安装位置: 下管; 前叉; 车把; 后货架; 车座; 座管; 上管; 通用; 其他
lt-LT: Dviračio laikiklio tvirtinimo vieta: Ant apatinio vamzdžio; Ant šakės; Ant vairo; Ant galinės bagažinės; Prie balnelio; Ant sėdynės vamzdžio; Ant viršutinio vamzdžio; Universalus; Kita
bg-BG: Позиция за монтаж на стойката за бутилка за велосипед: Долна тръба; Вилка; Кормило; Заден багажник; Седалка; Седалкова тръба; Горна тръба; Универсална; Друго
fr: Position de montage du porte-bidon sur vélo: Tube diagonal; Fourche; Guidon; Porte-bagages arrière; Selle; Tube de selle; Tube supérieur; Universel; Autre
sk-SK: Montážna poloha rámu bicykla: Spodná rámová rúrka; Vidlica; Riadidlá; Zadný nosič; Sedlo; Sedlová rúrka; Horná rámová rúrka; Univerzálne; Iné
pt-PT: Posição de montagem do suporte de garrafas para bicicleta: Tubo inferior; Forqueta; Guiador; Porta-bagagens traseiro; Selim; Tubo do selim; Tubo superior; Universal; Outro
da: Placering af flaskeholderens montering på cyklen: Skrårør; Forgaffel; Styr; Bagagebærer; Sadel; Sadelrør; Overrør; Universal; Andet
ro-RO: Poziția de montare a cuștii pentru biciclete: Cadru inferior; Furcă; Ghidon; Portbagaj spate; Șa; Țeavă șa; Țeavă superioară; Universal; Altele
th: ตำแหน่งติดตั้งขากระติกน้ำบนจักรยาน: ท่อล่าง; ตะเกียบ; แฮนด์; แร็คท้าย; อาน; ท่อนั่ง; ท่อบน; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
el: Θέση τοποθέτησης κλωβού ποδηλάτου: Κάτω σωλήνας; Πιρούνι; Τιμόνι; Πίσω σχάρα; Σέλα; Σωλήνας σέλας; Επάνω σωλήνας; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
fi: Polkupyörän korin kiinnityskohta: Viistoputki; Haarukka; Ohjaustanko; Tavarateline; Satula; Satulaputki; Vaakaputki; Yleismallinen; Muu
tr: Bisiklet kafesi montaj konumu: Alt boru; Maşa; Gidon; Arka bagaj; Sele; Sele borusu; Üst boru; Evrensel; Diğer
de: Montageposition des Fahrradkäfigs: Unterrohr; Gabel; Lenker; Gepäckträger; Sattel; Sitzrohr; Oberrohr; Universal; Sonstige
nb: Monteringsposisjon for sykkelbur: Underrør; Gaffel; Styre; Bagasjebrett bak; Sete; Seterør; Overrør; Universell; Annet
it: posizione di montaggio del portabici: Tubo obliquo; Forcella; Manubrio; Portapacchi posteriore; Sella; Piantone; Tubo orizzontale; Universale; Altro
vi: Vị trí lắp đặt giá đỡ bình nước trên xe đạp: Gióng dưới; Phuộc; Ghi đông; Gác ba ga sau; Yên xe; Gióng đứng; Gióng ngang; Mọi vị trí; Khác
cs: Montážní poloha klece na jízdní kolo: Spodní rámová trubka; Vidlice; Řídítka; Zadní nosič; Sedlo; Sedlová trubka; Horní rámová trubka; Univerzální; Jiné
en: Bicycle cage mounting position: Down tube; Fork; Handlebar; Rear rack; Saddle; Seat tube; Top tube; Universal; Other
pl: Pozycja montażu koszyka rowerowego: Dolna rura; Widelec; Kierownica; Tylny bagażnik; Siodełko; Rura podsiodłowa; Górna rura; Uniwersalne; Inne
ja: 自転車用ケージの取り付け位置: ダウンチューブ; フォーク; ハンドルバー; リアラック; サドル; シートチューブ; トップチューブ; ユニバーサル; その他
zh-TW: 自行車水壺架安裝位置: 下管; 前叉; 把手; 後貨架; 坐墊; 立管; 上管; 通用型; 其他
es: Posición de montaje del portabicicletas: Tubo inferior; Horquilla; Manubrio; Portaequipajes trasero; Sillín; Tubo del sillín; Tubo superior; Universal; Otro
ko: 자전거 케이지 장착 위치: 다운 튜브; 포크; 핸들바; 후면 랙; 안장; 시트 튜브; 탑 튜브; 범용; 기타
hr-HR: Položaj montaže držača za bidon: Donja cijev; Vilica; Upravljač; Stražnji nosač; Sjedalo; Cijev sjedala; Gornja cijev; Univerzalno; Ostalo
ru: Положение крепления флягодержателя на велосипеде: Нижняя труба; Вилка; Руль; Задний багажник; Седло; Подседельная труба; Верняя труба; Универсальное; Другое
pt-BR: Posição de montagem do suporte para garrafa da bicicleta: Tubo inferior; Garfo; Guidão; Bagageiro traseiro; Selim; Tubo do selim; Tubo superior; Universal; Outros
nl: Fiets bidonhouder montagepositie: Onderbuis; Voorvork; Stuur; Achterdrager; Zadel; Zitbuis; Bovenbuis; Universeel; Overig
sl-SI: Položaj za pritrditev držala za bidon: Spodnja cev; Vilice; Krmilo; Zadnji prtljažnik; Sedež; Sedežna cev; Zgornja cev; Univerzalno; Drugo